New York, session 2025-2026, S6446.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (q) of section 380-t of the general business 2 law is amended by adding two new paragraphs 3 and 4 to read as follows: 3 (3) In each instance where an entity receives a consumer credit report 4 authorized under paragraph three of subdivision (a) of section three 5 hundred eighty-b of this article, such entity shall provide the consumer 6 to which such consumer credit report relates with the notice set forth 7 in paragraph one of this subdivision and with any other information 8 necessary to place, temporarily lift or permanently lift a security 9 freeze, including but not limited to the address, telephone number or 10 point of contact at which consumer credit reporting agencies receive 11 such security freeze requests. 12 (4) In no instance shall a notice to a consumer sent pursuant to this 13 subdivision contain or be sent in accompaniment with language or materi- 14 als advertising or promoting a paid service of any kind. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10372-02-5